Montana, session 2025, HB848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Big sky rail account. (1) There is a big sky rail account in the state
special revenue fund established in 17-2-102. The account consists of money deposited in the account
pursuant to 15-68-820(2)(b).
(2) The money in the account is statutorily appropriated, as provided in 17-7-502, to the
department of transportation.
(3) The department of transportation shall annually distribute by August 1 money in the account to
regional rail authorities established pursuant to 7-14-1621 before January 1, 2025. A regional rail authority shall
use the money for the following purposes:
(a) administration of the rail authority;
(b) matching grants from the federal government;
(c) development of cooperative relationships with the federal government, other states, Canadian
provinces, railroads, and other parties to advance the purposes in subsection (3)(d); and
(d) to advance plan, design, develop, implement, and operate rail projects and services throughout
and connecting beyond the state that:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
(i) enhance the safety and performance of passenger and freight rail services and infrastructure,
provide coordinated transportation connections among train stations, airports, roads, streets, and highways and
transit systems;
(ii) create and improve passenger stations and related facilities, foster compatible development
around passenger stations, and increase connecting services from locations with stops on existing or future
passenger rail services operating within or through the state;
(iii) plan, develop, or expand transit and rental car facilities and related services at train stations,
destinations, and other locations that provide connecting services for rail passengers, such as airports or offsite
rental car locations;
(iv) develop energy production and distribution facilities and services for transportation and related
purposes; and
(v) explore and develop north-south train service within and beyond the state that connects to the
empire builder and big sky north coast corridors.

Section 2. Section 15-65-121, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-65-121. (Temporary) Distribution of tax proceeds. (1) The proceeds of the tax imposed by 15-
65-111 must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited in an account in the state special
revenue fund to the credit of the department. The department may spend from that account in accordance with
an expenditure appropriation by the legislature based on an estimate of the costs of collecting and disbursing
the proceeds of the tax. Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with the provisions of
17-2-124 and as provided in subsections (2)(a) through (2)(j) of this section, the department shall determine the
expenditures by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 4% of that amount from
the tax proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the portion of the 4% that was
paid with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal government and deposit
30% of the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state general fund.
(2) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not deducted pursuant to
the expenditure appropriation, deposited in the state general fund, distributed to agencies that paid the tax with
federal funds, or deposited in the heritage preservation and development account must be transferred to an
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department of commerce for the purposes
designated under 90-1-122, to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence or human trafficking
account, to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account, to the Montana historical
society, to the university system, to the state-tribal economic development commission, and to the department
of fish, wildlife, and parks, as follows:
(a) 1% to the Montana historical society to be used for the installation or maintenance of roadside
historical signs and historic sites;
(b) 2.5% to the university system for the establishment and maintenance of a Montana travel
research program;
(c) 6.5% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(d) 1.4% to the invasive species state special revenue account established in 80-7-1004;
(e) 60.2% to be used directly by the department of commerce as provided in 90-1-122[, and in part
to renovate the Miles City train depot];
(f) 0.1% to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence or human trafficking account
established in 44-4-1506;
(g) (i) except as provided in subsection (2)(g)(ii), 22.5% to be distributed by the department to
regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in each tourism region to the total
proceeds collected statewide; and
(ii) if 22.5% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located, to be distributed to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau in that city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district;
(h) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region;
(i) 2.6% to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account established in 22-3-
115; and
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
(j) 2.7% or $1 million, whichever is less, to the Montana heritage preservation and development
account provided for in 22-3-1004. The Montana heritage preservation and development commission shall
report on the use of funds received pursuant to this subsection (2)(j) to the legislative finance committee on a
semiannual basis, in accordance with 5-11-210.
(3) If a city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district qualifies under 15-68-
820(5)(b)(iii) 15-68-820(4)(b)(iii) or this section for funds but fails to either recognize a nonprofit convention and
visitors bureau or submit and gain approval for an annual marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those
funds must be allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism corporation in the region in which the city,
consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district is located.
(4) If a regional nonprofit tourism corporation fails to submit and gain approval for an annual
marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds otherwise allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism
corporation may be used by the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a
location for the production of motion pictures and television commercials.
(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c), (2)(e), and (2)(g) are statutorily appropriated to the entities as provided in 17-
7-502. The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the emergency lodging for victims of domestic violence
or human trafficking account pursuant to subsection (2)(f) are subject to the appropriation provisions in 44-4-
1506.
(6) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the invasive species state special revenue
account pursuant to subsection (2)(d), to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account
pursuant to subsection (2)(i), and to the Montana heritage preservation and development account pursuant to
subsection (2)(j) are subject to appropriation by the legislature. (Terminates June 30, 2027--sec. 12, Ch. 563, L.
2021; sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023; bracketed language in subsection (1)(e) terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 34,
Ch. 763, L. 2023.)
15-65-121. (Effective July 1, 2027) Distribution of tax proceeds. (1) The proceeds of the tax
imposed by 15-65-111 must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited in an account in the
state special revenue fund to the credit of the department. The department may spend from that account in
accordance with an expenditure appropriation by the legislature based on an estimate of the costs of collecting
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
and disbursing the proceeds of the tax. Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with
the provisions of 17-2-124 and as provided in subsections (2)(a) through (2)(h) of this section, the department
shall determine the expenditures by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 4%
of that amount from the tax proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the
portion of the 4% that was paid with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal
government and deposit 30% of the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state
general fund. The amount of $400,000 each year must be deposited in the Montana heritage preservation and
development account provided for in 22-3-1004.
(2) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not deducted pursuant to
the expenditure appropriation, deposited in the state general fund, distributed to agencies that paid the tax with
federal funds, or deposited in the heritage preservation and development account must be transferred to an
account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department of commerce for the purposes
designated under 90-1-122, to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account, to the
Montana historical society, to the university system, to the state-tribal economic development commission, and
to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks, as follows:
(a) 1% to the Montana historical society to be used for the installation or maintenance of roadside
historical signs and historic sites;
(b) 2.5% to the university system for the establishment and maintenance of a Montana travel
research program;
(c) 6.5% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(d) 1.4% to the invasive species state special revenue account established in 80-7-1004;
(e) 63% to be used directly by the department of commerce as provided in 90-1-122;
(f) (i) except as provided in subsection (2)(f)(ii), 22.5% to be distributed by the department to
regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in each tourism region to the total
proceeds collected statewide; and
(ii) if 22.5% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located, to be distributed to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau in that city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district;
(g) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region; and
(h) 2.6% to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account established in 22-3-
115.
(3) If a city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district qualifies under 15-68-
820(5)(b)(iii) 15-68-820(4)(b)(iii) or this section for funds but fails to either recognize a nonprofit convention and
visitors bureau or submit and gain approval for an annual marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those
funds must be allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism corporation in the region in which the city,
consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area district is located.
(4) If a regional nonprofit tourism corporation fails to submit and gain approval for an annual
marketing plan as required in 15-65-122, then those funds otherwise allocated to the regional nonprofit tourism
corporation may be used by the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a
location for the production of motion pictures and television commercials.
(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsections (2)(a) through (2)(c), (2)(e), and (2)(f) are statutorily appropriated to the entities as provided in 17-
7-502.
(6) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to the invasive species state special revenue
account pursuant to subsection (2)(d) and to the Montana historical interpretation state special revenue account
pursuant to subsection (2)(h) are subject to appropriation by the legislature."

Section 3. Section 15-68-820, MCA, is amended to read:
"15-68-820. Sales tax and use tax proceeds. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (6),
all All money collected under this chapter must, in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-124, be deposited by
the department into the general fund as provided in subsections (2) through (4).
(2) Twenty-five percent of the The revenue collected on the base rental charge for rental vehicles
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
under 15-68-102(1)(b) and 15-68-102(3)(a)(ii) must be deposited as follows:
(a) 50% in the general fund;
(b) 25% in the big sky rail account provided for in [section 1]; and
(c) 25% in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the senior citizen and persons with
disabilities transportation services account provided for in 7-14-112.
(3) Until December 31, 2024, a portion of the The revenue collected on the sale or use of
accommodations and campgrounds under 15-68-102(1)(a) and (3)(a)(i) must be deposited as follows:
(a) 20% in the account established in 22-3-1303 for construction of the Montana heritage center;
and
(b) 5% in the account established in 22-3-1307 for historic preservation grants.
(4) Starting January 1, 2025, a portion of the revenue collected on the sale or use of
accommodations and campgrounds under 15-68-102 (1)(a) and (3)(a)(i) must be deposited or distributed as
follows:
(a) 75% in the general fund;
(b) 6% in the account established in 22-3-1304 for operation and maintenance of the Montana
heritage center;
(b)(c) 6% distributed as provided in subsection (5) (4);
(c)(d) 6% in the account established in 22-3-1307 for historic preservation grants; and
(d)(e) 7% in the account established in 17-7-209.
(5)(4) (a) Before allocating the balance of the tax proceeds in accordance with the provisions of 17-2-
124 and as provided in subsection (5)(b) (4)(b) of this section, the department shall determine the expenditures
by state agencies for in-state lodging for each reporting period and deduct 1% of that amount from the tax
proceeds received each reporting period. The department shall distribute the portion of the 1% that was paid
with federal funds to the department of administration for return to the federal government and deposit 30% of
the amount deducted less the portion paid with federal funds in the state general fund.
(b) The balance of the tax proceeds received each reporting period and not distributed to agencies
that paid the tax with federal funds must be transferred to an account in the state special revenue fund to the
credit of the department of commerce for tourism promotion and promotion of the state as a location for the
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
production of motion pictures and television commercials, to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks, and to
the state-tribal economic development commission as follows:
(i) 7% to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for the maintenance of facilities in state parks
that have both resident and nonresident use;
(ii) 68.5% to be used directly by the department of commerce;
(iii) (A) except as provided in subsection (5)(b)(iii)(B) (4)(b)(iii)(B), 24% to be distributed by the
department of commerce to regional nonprofit tourism corporations in the ratio of the proceeds collected in
each tourism region to the total proceeds collected statewide; and
(B) if 24% of the proceeds collected annually within the limits of a city, consolidated city-county,
resort area, or resort area district exceeds $35,000, 50% of the amount available for distribution to the regional
nonprofit tourism corporation in the region where the city, consolidated city-county, resort area, or resort area
district is located to be distributed to the nonprofit convention and visitors bureau in that city, consolidated city-
county, resort area, or resort area district; and
(iv) 0.5% to the state special revenue account provided for in 90-1-135 for use by the state-tribal
economic development commission established in 90-1-131 for activities in the Indian tourism region.
(6)(5) The tax proceeds received that are transferred to a state special revenue account pursuant to
subsection (5)(b) (4)(b) are allocated to the entities."

Section 4. Section 17-7-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-7-502. Statutory appropriations -- definition -- requisites for validity. (1) A statutory
appropriation is an appropriation made by permanent law that authorizes spending by a state agency without
the need for a biennial legislative appropriation or budget amendment.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4), to be effective, a statutory appropriation must comply with
both of the following provisions:
(a) The law containing the statutory authority must be listed in subsection (3).
(b) The law or portion of the law making a statutory appropriation must specifically state that a
statutory appropriation is made as provided in this section.
(3) The following laws are the only laws containing statutory appropriations: 2-17-105; 5-11-120; 5-
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
11-407; 5-13-403; 5-13-404; 7-4-2502; 7-4-2924; 7-32-236; 10-1-108; 10-1-1202; 10-1-1303; 10-2-603; 10-2-
807; 10-3-203; 10-3-310; 10-3-312; 10-3-314; 10-3-316; 10-3-802; 10-3-1304; 10-4-304; 10-4-310; 15-1-121;
15-1-142; 15-1-143; 15-1-218; 15-1-2302; 15-31-165; 15-31-1004; 15-31-1005; 15-35-108; 15-36-332; 15-37-
117; 15-39-110; 15-65-121; 15-70-128; 15-70-131; 15-70-132; 15-70-433; 16-11-119; 16-11-509; 17-3-106; 17-
3-212; 17-3-222; 17-3-241; 17-6-101; 17-6-214; 17-7-133; 17-7-215; 18-11-112; 19-3-319; 19-3-320; 19-6-410;
19-9-702; 19-13-604; 19-17-301; 19-18-512; 19-19-305; 19-19-506; 19-20-604; 19-20-607; 19-21-203; 20-3-
369; 20-7-1709; 20-8-107; 20-9-250; 20-9-534; 20-9-622; [20-15-328]; 20-26-617; 20-26-1503; 22-1-327; 22-3-
116; 22-3-117; [22-3-1004]; 23-4-105; 23-5-306; 23-5-409; 23-5-612; 23-7-301; 23-7-402; 30-10-1004; 37-43-
204; 37-50-209; 37-54-113; 39-71-503; 41-5-2011; 42-2-105; 44-4-1101; 44-4-1506; 44-12-213; 44-13-102; 50-
1-115; 53-1-109; 53-6-148; 53-9-113; 53-24-108; 53-24-206; 60-5-530; 60-11-115; [section 1]; 61-3-321; 61-3-
415; 67-1-309; 69-3-870; 69-4-527; 75-1-1101; 75-5-1108; 75-6-214; 75-11-313; 75-26-308; 76-13-150; 76-13-
151; 76-13-417; 76-17-103; 77-1-108; 77-2-362; 80-2-222; 80-4-416; 80-11-518; 80-11-1006; 81-1-112; 81-1-
113; 81-2-203; 81-7-106; 81-7-123; 81-10-103; 82-11-161; 85-20-1504; 85-20-1505; [85-25-102]; 87-1-603; 87-
5-909; 90-1-115; 90-1-205; 90-1-504; 90-6-331; and 90-9-306.
(4) There is a statutory appropriation to pay the principal, interest, premiums, and any costs or fees
associated with issuing, paying, securing, redeeming, or defeasing all bonds, notes, or other obligations, as due
in the ordinary course or when earlier called for redemption or defeased, that have been authorized and issued
pursuant to the laws of Montana. Agencies that have entered into agreements authorized by the laws of
Montana to pay the state treasurer, for deposit in accordance with 17-2-101 through 17-2-107, as determined
by the state treasurer, an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest as due on the bonds or notes have
statutory appropriation authority for the payments. (In subsection (3): pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 360, L. 1999, the
inclusion of 19-20-604 terminates contingently when the amortization period for the teachers' retirement
system's unfunded liability is 10 years or less; pursuant to sec. 73, Ch. 44, L. 2007, the inclusion of 19-6-410
terminates contingently upon the death of the last recipient eligible under 19-6-709(2) for the supplemental
benefit provided by 19-6-709; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 383, L. 2015, the inclusion of 85-25-102 is effective on
occurrence of contingency; pursuant to sec. 6, Ch. 423, L. 2015, the inclusion of 22-3-116 and 22-3-117
terminates June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 4, Ch. 122, L. 2017, the inclusion of 10-3-1304 terminates
September 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch. 213, L. 2017, the inclusion of 90-6-331 terminates June 30, 2027;
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 374, L. 2017, the inclusion of 76-17-103 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to secs.
11, 12, and 14, Ch. 343, L. 2019, the inclusion of 15-35-108 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch.
408, L. 2019, the inclusion of 17-7-215 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to secs. 1, 2, 3, Ch. 139, L. 2021,
the inclusion of 53-9-113 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 8, Ch. 200, L. 2021, the inclusion of 10-4-
310 terminates July 1, 2031; pursuant to secs. 3, 4, Ch. 404, L. 2021, the inclusion of 30-10-1004 terminates
June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 548, L. 2021, the inclusion of 50-1-115 terminates June 30, 2025;
pursuant to secs. 5 and 12, Ch. 563, L. 2021, the inclusion of 22-3-1004 is effective July 1, 2027; pursuant to
sec. 1, Ch. 20, L. 2023, sec. 2, Ch. 20, L. 2023, and sec. 3, Ch. 20, L. 2023, the inclusion of 81-1-112, 81-1-
113, and 81-7-106 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to sec. 9, Ch. 44, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-142
terminates December 31, 2025; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 47, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-2302 terminates
June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 2, Ch. 374, L. 2023, the inclusion of 10-3-802 terminates June 30, 2031;
pursuant to sec. 12, Ch. 558, L. 2023, the inclusion of 20-9-250 terminates December 31, 2029; pursuant to
sec. 4, Ch. 621, L. 2023, the inclusion of 22-1-327 terminates July 1, 2029; pursuant to sec. 24, Ch. 722, L.
2023, the inclusion of 17-7-133 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023, the inclusion
of 44-4-1506 terminates June 30, 2027; and pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 764, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-143
terminates December 31, 2025.)"

Section 5. Section 22-3-1303, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1303. Account -- Montana heritage center construction. There is an account in the capital
projects fund established in 17-2-102 known as the Montana heritage center construction account. The tax
collections allocated in the former 15-68-820(3)(a) before the amendments of [this act] must be deposited in the
account until December 31, 2024. The money in the account is authorized to the department of administration
and may be used only for capital construction of the Montana heritage center."

Section 6. Section 22-3-1304, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1304. Account -- Montana heritage center operations. There is an account in the state
special revenue fund established in 17-2-102 known as the Montana heritage center operations account. The
tax collections allocated in 15-68-820(4)(a) must be deposited in the account. The money in the account may
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 848.1
be used only for expenses incurred in the operation and maintenance of the Montana heritage center, which
may include the veterans' and pioneer memorial building."

Section 7. Section 22-3-1307, MCA, is amended to read:
"22-3-1307. Historic preservation grant program account. (1) There is an account in the state
special revenue fund established in 17-2-102 known as the historic preservation grant program account. The
tax collections allocated in 15-68-820(3)(b) and (4)(c) must be deposited in the account.
(2) Money deposited in the account is subject to appropriation by the legislature and may be used
only for historic preservation grants to be administered by the department of commerce.
(3) The department shall allocate and disburse historic preservation account funds as appropriated
by the legislature."

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 60, chapter 11, part 1, and the provisions of Title 60, chapter 11, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 848